Utah statutes.
9-9-204.   Criminal jurisdiction.
The state of Utah shall assume jurisdiction over offenses as set forth in this
chapter, committed by or against Indians in the lands described in each tribal
resolution 60 days after issuance of the governor's proclamation to the same
extent it has jurisdiction over offenses committed elsewhere within the state.
The criminal laws of the state shall have the same force and effect within
these lands as they have elsewhere within the state.
